Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 2. Amendments to the Constitution of the United States

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Elections, §§ 1, 2.

§ 22-20-201.
Proclamation of governor calling state ratifying convention.

If the congress of the United States of America proposes any question of repealing, amending or altering the constitution of the United States of America, or any part thereof, to be submitted to a ratifying convention of delegates chosen by the qualified electors of the state and does not prescribe the manner and method of calling, holding and conducting the convention and of canvassing the returns of the votes of the delegates thereto and determining, declaring and publishing the result of the vote of the delegates to the ratifying convention on any question voted upon, for which the ratifying convention is called, it is the duty of the governor to make a public proclamation:

Calling the state ratifying convention;

Calling for the election of delegates to the state ratifying convention;

Specifying the place where and the time when the ratifying convention shall be held;

Specifying the number of delegates (who shall be qualified electors) of which the ratifying convention shall consist; and

Specifying the method and manner by and in which delegates to the ratifying convention shall be elected.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 2; 2017 ch. 197, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a) added “ratifying” before “convention” throughout the subsection and substituted “proposes” for “enact any law requiring” in the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-20-202.
Election of delegates to state ratifying convention.

In each county of this state there shall be held a county convention of the qualified electors of the county at the time fixed by the proclamation. An election shall be held in which not less than five (5) delegates from each county and (1) one additional delegate for each five thousand (5,000) or major portion thereof of the inhabitants of the county shall be elected as delegates to the state ratifying convention specified in W.S.

22-20-201

.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 2; 2017 ch. 197, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

§ 22-20-203.
Convening of county convention; presiding officer; certification of results.

It is the duty of the chairman of the board of county commissioners or some other member of the board in each county to convene the county convention and preside over it until the delegates chosen thereto select a chairman of the convention. It is the duty of the chairman and secretary of the convention to certify, under oath, to the secretary of state and to the state ratifying convention, the names of the delegates to the state ratifying convention chosen by the county convention.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 2; 2017 ch. 197, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a) added “ratifying” before “convention” twice.

§ 22-20-204.
Rules of practice for county conventions; convention ballots.

The rules of practice, procedure and conduct of the business of the several county conventions specified in W.S.

22-20-202

are those prescribed by “Robert’s Rules of Parliamentary Procedure and Order”.

The vote on the selection of delegates to the state ratifying convention shall be by written or printed ballot.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 2; 2017 ch. 197, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (b) substituted “state ratifying convention” for “county and state conventions.”

§ 22-20-205.
Determining apportionment of representation at conventions.

In the apportionment of representation in the county convention and state ratifying convention, the last federal census is the basis upon which the right to representation in the conventions shall be determined.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 2; 2009, ch. 170, § 1; 2017 ch. 197, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “federal census” for “census enumeration taken by the
United States government.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added “convention” following “county” and substituted “state ratifying convention” for “state conventions”.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009 ch 170 § 3 provides:

“(a) No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b) No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

§ 22-20-206.
Board of commissioners to act as election commissioners.

For the purpose of providing the necessary facilities and conveniences for conducting each of the meetings and conventions provided for by this chapter, the board of county commissioners of the several counties of this state are appointed election commissioners of their respective counties. It is their duty to do all things necessary and proper to facilitate the qualified electors of their respective counties in expressing their will upon any question submitted to them by the congress of the United States of America.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 2.

§ 22-20-207.
Costs and expenses to be borne by county.

All costs incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter in each county shall be borne and paid by the county in which the costs accrued.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 2.

§ 22-20-208.
Convening of state ratifying convention; costs and expenses; certification of results.

If the governor issues a proclamation calling a state ratifying convention, it is the duty of the secretary of state to convene the ratifying convention and make all necessary arrangements.

The costs incidental to the holding of the state ratifying convention shall be borne and paid by the state, as appropriated by the legislature.

It is the duty of the officers of the state ratifying convention to certify, under oath, to the secretary of state, the result of the vote cast at the ratifying convention on each question submitted thereto. When the result of the vote of the delegates to the state ratifying convention is certified to the secretary of state, it is then the duty of the secretary of state to certify the result to the president and secretary of state of the United States, and to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives of the congress of the United States.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2017 ch. 197, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a), (b), and (c) substituted “states ratifying convention” for “state convention” numerous times.

§ 22-20-209.
Procedure when congress directs manner of holding ratifying convention.

If congress, either in the resolution submitting the question or by statute, prescribes the manner in which the ratifying convention shall be constituted, the provisions of this chapter are inoperative, and the ratifying convention shall be constituted and shall operate as the resolution or act of congress directs. All officers of the state who may be authorized or directed by the resolution or statute to take any action to constitute a ratifying convention for this state are authorized and directed to act in accordance therewith and in obedience thereto with the same force and effect as if acting under a statute of this state.

If an article V convention as defined in W.S.

9-22-101

is called, the provisions of this chapter are inoperative to the extent that they conflict with a convention conducted in accordance with W.S.

9-22-102

.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 2; 2017 ch. 197, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added the designation (a), substituted “ratifying convention” for “conventions”, added “ratifying” before “convention” twice; and added (b).